Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201823-2529
Veterans preference; sections applicable.

Veterans preference
shall be given in accordance with sections 48-225 to 48-231.

Laws 1974, LB 995, § 13;

Laws 1991, LB 2, § 4;

Laws 2014, LB588, § 1.